District of Columbia statutes.
36-125

Proceeding in Superior Court to ascertain violations; search warrant.

Whenever any person who has registered milk bottles, cans, crates, or other containers in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter shall by himself or his agent make oath before the Clerk of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia that he has reason to believe, and does believe, that any of his registered milk bottles, cans, crates, or other containers are being filled, used, bought, trafficked in, held, sold, offered for sale, broken, injured, or destroyed within the District of Columbia contrary to the provisions of this subchapter, by any person without the written consent of the registrant, the judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to whom said complaint under oath is made may forthwith issue a search warrant directed to any police officer or other proper officer to search the premises whereon or wherein said registered milk bottles, cans, crates, or other containers are unlawfully held and may issue a warrant for the arrest of the person complained against; and if any one or more of such registered milk bottles, cans, crates, or other containers, or any parts of the same, shall be found upon the premises by the officer executing the said search warrant, he shall seize and take possession of all such registered milk bottles, cans, crates, or other containers, or parts thereof, and shall cause the same to be brought before the judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, who shall award the said registered milk bottles, cans, crates, and other containers to the person entitled to the same.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 810, ch. 737, § 5
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
1973 Ed., § 48-205.
1981 Ed., § 48-205.
Search warrants, see § 23-521 et seq.
Return of property by Property Clerk, see § 5-119.06.